Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 HF 175 (2) 91 je/jh/md H.F. 175 Section 1. Section 260C.14, subsection 14, paragraph b, 1 Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. (1) Adopt rules to classify as residents for purposes of 3 tuition and mandatory fees, qualified veterans and qualified 4 military persons and their spouses , and dependent children , and 5 survivors who are domiciled in this state while enrolled in a 6 community college. A spouse , or dependent child , or survivor 7 of a military person or veteran shall not be deemed a resident 8 under this paragraph âbâ unless the qualified military person or 9 qualified veteran meets the requirements of subparagraph (2), 10 subparagraph division (b) or (c), as appropriate. 11 (2) For purposes of this paragraph âbâ , unless the context 12 otherwise requires: 13 (a) (i) âDependent childâ means a student who was claimed 14 by a qualified military person or qualified veteran as a 15 dependent on the qualified military personâs or qualified 16 veteranâs internal revenue service tax filing for the previous 17 tax year. 18 (ii) In the case of a survivor, âdependent childâ means 19 a student who was claimed by a qualified military person or 20 qualified veteran as a dependent on the qualified military 21 personâs or qualified veteranâs internal revenue service tax 22 filing for the last tax year for which the qualified military 23 person or qualified veteran filed. 24 (b) âQualified military personâ means a person on active 25 duty in the military service of the United States who is 26 stationed in this state or at the Rock Island arsenal . If 27 the qualified military person is transferred, deployed, or 28 restationed while the personâs spouse or dependent child is 29 enrolled in the community college, the spouse or dependent 30 child shall continue to be classified as a resident provided 31 the spouse or dependent child maintains continuous enrollment. 32 (c) âQualified veteranâ means a person , other than 33 a qualified military person, who meets the following 34 requirements: is a veteran as defined in section 35.1, 35 -1- HF 175 (2) 91 je/jh/md 1/ 3 H.F. 175 notwithstanding any residency requirement in that section. 1 (i) Is eligible for benefits, or has exhausted the benefits, 2 under the federal Post-9/11 Veterans Educational Assistance Act 3 of 2008. 4 (ii) Is domiciled in this state, or has resided in this 5 state for at least one year or sufficient time to have filed an 6 Iowa tax return in the preceding twelve months. 7 (d) âSurvivorâ means a student who is the spouse or 8 dependent child of a deceased veteran, as defined in section 9 35.1. 10 Sec. 2. Section 262.9, subsection 17, paragraph b, Code 11 2025, is amended to read as follows: 12 b. (1) Adopt rules to classify as residents for purposes of 13 undergraduate tuition and mandatory fees, qualified veterans 14 and qualified military persons and their spouses , and dependent 15 children , and survivors who are domiciled in this state while 16 enrolled in an institution of higher education under the board. 17 A spouse , or dependent child , or survivor of a military person 18 or veteran shall not be deemed a resident under this paragraph 19 âbâ unless the qualified military person or qualified veteran 20 meets the requirements of subparagraph (2), subparagraph 21 division (b) or (c), as appropriate. 22 (2) For purposes of this paragraph âbâ , unless the context 23 otherwise requires: 24 (a) (i) âDependent childâ means a student who was claimed 25 by a qualified military person or qualified veteran as a 26 dependent on the qualified military personâs or qualified 27 veteranâs internal revenue service tax filing for the previous 28 tax year. 29 (ii) In the case of a survivor, âdependent childâ means 30 a student who was claimed by a qualified military person or 31 qualified veteran as a dependent on the qualified military 32 personâs or qualified veteranâs internal revenue service tax 33 filing for the last tax year for which the qualified military 34 person or qualified veteran filed. 35 -2- HF 175 (2) 91 je/jh/md 2/ 3 H.F. 175 (b) âQualified military personâ means a person on active 1 duty in the military service of the United States who is 2 stationed in this state or at the Rock Island arsenal . If 3 the qualified military person is transferred, deployed, or 4 restationed while the personâs spouse or dependent child is 5 enrolled in an institution of higher education under the 6 control of the board, the spouse or dependent child shall 7 continue to be classified as a resident provided the spouse or 8 dependent child maintains continuous enrollment. 9 (c) âQualified veteranâ means a person , other than 10 a qualified military person, who meets the following 11 requirements: is a veteran as defined in section 35.1, 12 notwithstanding any residency requirement in that section. 13 (i) Is eligible for benefits, or has exhausted the benefits, 14 under the federal Post-9/11 Veterans Educational Assistance Act 15 of 2008. 16 (ii) Is domiciled in this state, or has resided in this 17 state for at least one year or sufficient time to have filed an 18 Iowa tax return in the preceding twelve months. 19 (d) âSurvivorâ means a student who is the spouse or 20 dependent child of a deceased veteran, as defined in section 21 35.1. 22 -3- HF 175 (2) 91 je/jh/md 3/ 3